Utah statutes.
34-48-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Adverse action" means to discharge, threaten, or otherwise discriminate against an employee in any manner that affects the employee's employment, including compensation, terms, conditions, location, rights, immunities, promotions, or privileges.

(2)  "Employer" means a person, including the state or a political subdivision of the state, that has one or more workers or operators employed in the same business, or in or about the same establishment, under any contract of hire, express or implied, oral or written.

(3)  "Law enforcement agency" is as defined in Section 53-1-102.

(4) (a)  "Personal Internet account" means an online account that is used by an employee or applicant exclusively for personal communications unrelated to any business purpose of the employer.

(b)  "Personal Internet account" does not include an account created, maintained, used, or accessed by an employee or applicant for business related communications or for a business purpose of the employer.



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

